Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2512.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2607 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 2607. Rates and forms of compensation.* * *(g) Prohibition on surveillance prices.--A transportation network company may not charge a fare based on, in whole or in part, any of the following input data:(1) The hardware or hardware state of an online device. (2) The presence or absence of software on the online device.(3) Geolocation data of the online device, except:(i) To the extent related to differences in the 1234567891011121314151617 costs or demands associated with providing a good or service to different consumers.(ii) To determine a price based on the real-time or historical demand for the product or service in the consumer's vicinity, if the price is provided immediately upon request.(iii) To provide accurate pricing information based on price variances at different physical locations, due to legitimate cost or demand differentials or State or local government taxes, duties or other fees.(iv) To provide a consumer with a promotion or discount that lowers the price from what the price would otherwise have been.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:" Hardware state." A condition or mode of existence of a system, component or simulation, including:(1) The battery life, number of wireless connections detected and age of the online device.(2) Data that is erased or retained when an online device is restarted or powered down."Online device." A physical object that has built-in resources that allow it to communicate through the Internet or a short-range wireless technology and react to interface conditions, including a laptop computer, desktop computer, tablet, smartphone or other smart hardware.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2512PN3399 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728